New Jersey, session 221, S3366.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1977, c.369 (C.39:3-27.8) is amended as follows: 1.    Upon the application of any person who is a compensated, partially compensated or volunteer member of any fire department in this State, the [director] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may issue for a motor vehicle owned or leased by [such] the person, or owned by the spouse or parent thereof, or owned by a business firm of which [such] the person is the principal owner or stockholder a license plate bearing a Maltese Cross and the letters "F.D."   The design and color for [such] the plate shall be approved by the [director] chief administrator. Upon the application of any person who is a compensated, partially compensated or volunteer member of any first aid or rescue squad in this State, the [director] chief administrator may issue for a motor vehicle owned or leased by [such] the person, or owned by the spouse or parent thereof, or owned by a business firm of which [such] the person is the principal owner or stockholder a special license plate.  The design for [such] the plate shall be approved by the [director] chief administrator. (cf: P.L.1983, c.74, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1977, c.369 (C.39:3-27.9) is amended as follows: 2. 1a.1  The special plate authorized by [this act] P.L.1977, c.369 (C.39:3-27.8 et seq.) may be issued upon proof, satisfactory to the [director] chief administrator, that the applicant is presently a bona fide member of a fire fighting department or first aid or rescue squad in this State.  [The fee for such plate shall be $15.00 in addition to the] There shall be no additional fee imposed for the special plate, except for any fees otherwise prescribed by law for the registration of [such] the motor vehicle. 1b.  An individual issued a special plate pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be required to annually renew the special plate.  The renewal shall require submission of proof, as determined by the chief administrator, that demonstrates that the individual remains a bona fide member of a fire fighting department or first aid or rescue squad in this State.1 (cf: P.L.1979, c.447, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1977, c.369 (C.39:3-27.10) is amended as follows: 3.    Any person lawfully in possession of [such] the special plate who resigns, is removed or otherwise terminates or is terminated from his association with [such] the fire department or first aid or rescue squad, shall return [such] the special plate to the [division] commission within 15 days. (cf: P.L.1979, c.447, s.3) 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.